District of Columbia statutes.
47-1011

Property of United States, District of Columbia, and foreign legations exempt from assessments for improvements.

No property except that of the United States or the District of Columbia and property owned by foreign governments for legation purposes shall be exempt from assessments for improvements.

Mar. 3, 1903, 32 Stat. 961, ch. 992
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Special assessments, improvement of streets about the Capitol, see § 47-1207.
1981 Ed., § 47-1011.
1973 Ed., § 47-803.